District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.25

Regulations.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with § 2-505, promulgate reasonable rules, regulations, or orders as are necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 125, 48 DCR 1225